Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB86.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 11 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Governor shall submit a written request to the Kentucky State Treasurer for
permission to use tax dollars for international travel. The request shall articulate how
the international travel will yield a benefit to the Commonwealth of Kentucky. Tax
dollars shall not be used for international travel by the Governor without the Kentucky
State Treasurer's approval.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/10/2025 11:55 AM Jacketed